Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
VOTING AGREEMENTS

7-127-301. Voting agreements.

Two or more members may provide for the manner in which they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.